Arkansas, session 2025, SB495.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-57-203(15) and (16), concerning the
definitions to be used under the Arkansas Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1977,
are amended to read as follows:
(15) “Invoice” means documentation that is:
(A) Made contemporaneously with a sale or purchase of
tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid
products; and
(B) Sufficient to show an itemized list of the specific
merchandise or inventory shipped, purchased, or sold, including without
limitation the quantity and prices charged; and
(C) Sufficient to identify the parties to the transaction,
*JLL109*
03/17/2025 5:24:19 PM JLL109

SB495
including without limitation:
(i) The physical address of the permitted wholesaler
or the permitted manufacturer selling the tobacco products, vapor products,
alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid products;
(ii) The permit number of the permitted wholesaler
or the permitted manufacturer selling the tobacco products, vapor products,
alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid products;
(iii) The physical address of the permitted retailer
or wholesaler purchasing the tobacco products, vapor products, alternative
nicotine products, or e-liquid products; and
(iv) The permit number of the permitted retailer or
wholesaler purchasing the tobacco products, vapor products, alternative
nicotine products, or e-liquid products;
(16)(A) “Invoice price” means the price that a wholesaler or
retailer of tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products,
or e-liquid products pays to a manufacturer, importer, distributor, or any
other seller to acquire tobacco products, vapor products, alternative
nicotine products, or e-liquid products that the purchaser subsequently sells
in the state.
(B) In the absence of proof by the person possessing the
tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid
products of the price at which the tobacco products, vapor products,
alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid products were purchased, “invoice
price” shall be the highest price, in the normal course of business and
before any discount, at which: the
(i) The manufacturer of the tobacco products, vapor
products, alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid products sells the
tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid
products in question; or
(ii) In the absence of the information required
under subdivision (16)(B)(i) of this section, a similar wholesaler or
retailer that sells the same or comparable tobacco products, vapor products,
alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid products sells the same or
comparable tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products,
or e-liquid products.

03/17/2025 5:24:19 PM JLL109